Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB657.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1021(d) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1021. Regulations.--* * *(d) The department shall develop regulations under this article in consultation with industry stakeholders, consumers and other interested parties. In developing and adopting regulations under this article, the department:(1) Shall maximize the types of settings in which individuals may live or receive residential services, day programming services, adult day care and vocational services that are funded through a home- and community-based waiver.(2) Shall maximize and prioritize the exercise of individual 12345678910111213141516171819 choice in the selection of the settings in which individuals reside or receive services.(3) Shall not impose any requirements on the types of settings that may be funded through a home- and community-based waiver beyond those imposed by Federal law under 42 U.S.C. § 1396n (relating to compliance with State plan and payment provisions).(4) Shall not preclude settings from receiving funding through a home- and community-based waiver due to location, service type, size or type or number of individuals served except as required by Federal law under 42 U.S.C. § 1396n.(e) Within one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall amend all rules and regulations inconsistent with subsection (d)(1), (2), (3) and (4), including 55 Pa. Code §§ 6100.444 (relating to size of service location) and 6100.445 (relating to locality of service location), and shall submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services amendments to the State plan and all home- and community-based waivers to bring the State plan and waivers into compliance with the requirements of subsection (d)(1), (2), (3) and (4).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0657PN0766 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122